Arkansas, session 2025, HB1680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-11-110(a)—(c), prohibitions on land
ownership by a prohibited foreign-party-controlled business, are amended to
*ZRC075*
03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1680
read as follows:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Controlling interest” means an ownership interest of fifty
percent (50%) or more, in the aggregate;
(2)(A) "Critical infrastructure" means physical or virtual
systems and assets that:
(i) If incapacitated or destroyed would have a
debilitating impact on security, national economic security, public health or
safety, or any combination of security, national economic security, or public
health and safety; and
(ii) Are publicly or privately owned.
(B) "Critical infrastructure" includes without limitation:
(i) A military installation or facility;
(ii) An emergency service;
(iii) A power generation or transmission location;
(iv) A utility;
(v) A bridge;
(vi) A tunnel;
(vii) A railway;
(viii) A dam;
(ix) A cybersecurity or classified information
storage system; and
(x) A communication or information technology node
or facility;
(3) “Prohibited foreign party” means the same as in § 18-11-802;
and
(3)(4) “Prohibited foreign-party-controlled business” means a
corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, society, joint-stock
company, trust, estate, or other legal entity whose controlling interest is
owned by a prohibited foreign party.
(b)(1) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business shall not
acquire by grant, purchase, lease, devise, descent, or otherwise any interest
in public or private land in this state.
(2) A party may not hold or retain public or private land as an
agent, trustee, or other fiduciary for a prohibited foreign-party-controlled
business in violation of this section.
03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1680
(3) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business shall not
lease any interest in land in this state.
(4) A prohibited foreign party shall not hold any interest in
agricultural land located within a ten-mile radius of critical
infrastructure.
(c)(1) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business entity in
violation of this section shall have two (2) years one (1) year to divest of
the public or private land.
(2) If a prohibited foreign-party-controlled business entity
does not divest the public or private land as required by subdivision (c)(1)
of this section, the Attorney General shall commence an action in the circuit
court within the jurisdiction of the public or private land.
(3)(A) If the public or private land is held in violation of
this section, the circuit court shall order that the public or private land
be sold through judicial foreclosure.
(B) Proceeds of the sale shall be first disbursed to lien
holders, if any, in the order of priority, except for liens which under the
terms of the sale are to remain on the public or private land.
(4) The Attorney General shall promptly record a copy of the
following in the local land records:
(A) Upon commencement, notice of the pendency of an action
brought under subdivision (c)(2) of this section; and
(B) The order for the sale of the public or private land
under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 18-11-802 is amended to read as follows:
18-11-802. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Agricultural land” means any Arkansas land which that is
outside the corporate limits of a municipality and is:
(i) Used for forestry production, including without
limitation land exceeding ten (10) acres in which ten percent (10%) of the
land is stocked by trees of any size, including land that formerly had trees
of any size covering the land that will be naturally or artificially
regenerated; or
(ii) Currently used for, or, if currently idle, land
03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1680
last used within the past five (5) years, for farming, ranching, or timber
production, except land not exceeding ten (10) acres in the aggregate, if the
annual gross receipts from the sale of the farm, ranch, or timber products
produced on the land do not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), including
without limitation land used for activities described in the Standard
Industrial Classification Manual (1987), Division A, exclusive of industry
numbers 0711-0783, 0851, and 0912-0919 which cover animal trapping, game
management, hunting carried on as a business enterprise, trapping carried on
as a business enterprise, and wildlife management.
(B) “Agricultural land” does not include oil, gas, and all
other minerals, including coal, lignite, brine, and all minerals known and
recognized as commercial minerals underlying the land;
(2)(A) "Critical infrastructure" means physical or virtual
systems and assets that:
(i) If incapacitated or destroyed would have a
debilitating impact on security, national economic security, public health or
safety, or any combination of security, national economic security, or public
health and safety; and
(ii) Are publicly or privately owned.
(B) "Critical infrastructure" includes without limitation:
(i) A military installation or facility;
(ii) An emergency service;
(iii) A power generation or transmission location;
(iv) A utility;
(v) A bridge;
(vi) A tunnel;
(vii) A railway;
(viii) A dam;
(ix) A cybersecurity or classified information
storage system; and
(x) A communication or information technology node
or facility;
(3) “Foreign government” means the same as provided by § 2-3-
102;
(3)(4) “Interest in agricultural land” means all direct interest
acquired, transferred, or held in agricultural land, including without
03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1680
limitation a lease of agricultural land:
(A) For a term of one (1) year or longer; or
(B) Renewable by option for terms which, if the options
were all exercised, would total one (1) year;
(4)(5) “Party” means the same as provided by § 2-3-102;
(5)(6) “Prohibited foreign party” means:
(A) A citizen or resident of a country subject to
International Traffic in Arms Regulations, 22 C.F.R. § 126.1, unless the
person is also a citizen of the United States;
(B) A foreign government formed within a country subject
to International Traffic in Arms Regulations, 22 C.F.R. § 126.1;
(C) A party or entity other than an individual or a
government, that is created or organized under the laws of a foreign
government within a country subject to International Traffic in Arms
Regulations, 22 C.F.R. § 126.1;
(D) Any party or entity other than an individual or a
government:
(i) That is created or organized under the laws of
any state; and
(ii) In which a significant interest or substantial
control is directly or indirectly held or is capable of being exercised by:
(a) An individual referred to in subdivision
(5)(A) (6)(A) of this section;
(b) A foreign government referred to in
subdivision (5)(B) (6)(B) of this section;
(c) A party or entity referred to in
subdivision (5)(C) (6)(C) of this section; or
(d) A combination of the individuals, parties,
entities, or governments referred to in this subdivision (5)(D)(ii)
(6)(D)(ii);
(E) An Entity of Particular Concern designated by the
United States Department of State; or
(F) An agent, trustee, or other fiduciary of a person or
entity enumerated in subdivisions (5)(A)-(E) (6)(A)-(E) of this section;
(6)(7) “Residence” means a person's principal dwelling place
where the person intends to remain permanently for an indefinite period of
03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1680
time;
(7)(8) “Resident alien” means a person who:
(A) Is not a citizen of the United States; and
(B) Is a resident of a:
(i) State of the United States;
(ii) Territory of the United States;
(iii) Trusteeship of the United States; or
(iv) Protectorate of the United States; and
(8)(9) “Significant interest” or “substantial control” means:
(A) An interest of thirty-three percent (33%) or more held
by:
(i) A party referred to in subdivision (5)(D) (6)(D)
of this section;
(ii) An individual referred to in subdivision (5)(A)
(6)(A) of this section;
(iii) A party referred to in subdivision (5)(C)
(6)(C) of this section; or
(iv) A single government referred to in subdivision
(5)(B) (6)(B) of this section; or
(v) A party acting in concert with one (1) or more
prohibited foreign parties;
(B) An interest of thirty-three percent (33%) or more held
whenever the parties, individuals, or governments referred to in subdivision
(5) (6) of this section are acting in concert with respect to the interest
even though no single individual, party, or government holds an interest of
thirty-three percent (33%) or more; or
(C) An interest of fifty percent (50%) or more, in the
aggregate, held by parties, individuals, or governments referred to in
subdivision (5) (6) of this section even though the individuals, parties, or
foreign governments may not be acting in concert.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 18-11-803 is amended to read as follows:
18-11-803. Limitations on owning agricultural land — Violation.
(a)(1) Except as provided in § 18-11-804, a prohibited foreign party
shall not acquire by grant, purchase, lease, devise, descent, or otherwise
any interest in agricultural land in this state regardless of whether the
03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1680
prohibited foreign party intends to use the agricultural land for nonfarming
purposes.
(2) A party may not hold agricultural land as an agent, trustee,
or other fiduciary for a prohibited foreign party in violation of this
subchapter.
(3) A prohibited foreign party shall not hold any interest in
agricultural land located within a ten-mile radius of critical
infrastructure.
(b) A prohibited foreign party that acquires agricultural land in
violation of this subchapter remains in violation as long as the prohibited
foreign party holds an interest in the agricultural land.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 18-11-804(b)(1), concerning an interest in
agricultural land owned by a prohibited foreign party, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) If a prohibited foreign party is no longer a resident alien
under subsection (a) of this section, he or she shall have two (2) years one
(1) year to divest of the agricultural land.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 18-11-804(e), concerning an interest in
agricultural land owned by a prohibited foreign party, is amended to read as
follows:
(e) A prohibited foreign party or other party acting in concert with a
prohibited foreign party as an agent, trustee, or other fiduciary owning
agricultural land subsequent to the passage of this subchapter and not listed
under one (1) of the exceptions set out in subsections (a) and (b) of this
section shall upon conviction be guilty of a felony punishable by not more
than two (2) years' imprisonment in the custody of the Division of Correction
or a fine of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both.

/s/Vaught





03-31-2025 11:46:42 ZRC075